Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2315
Person, defined.

Person means an individual, partnership, limited liability company, association, municipality, state, county, political subdivision, utility, joint venture, or corporation and shall include the employer, employee, or contractor of an individual.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB462, § 5.